Hawaii statutes.
§39A-114 Conditions precedent to
negotiating and entering into a project agreement. (a) The department,
prior to entering into negotiations with respect to a project agreement or at
any time during negotiations, shall require that as a condition to the
negotiations or the continuation thereof, the project party shall agree to pay
all fees, costs, and expenses (direct or indirect) assessed by the department
even though a project agreement may not be entered into and may further require
the deposit of moneys with the department to pay for fees, costs, and
expenses. Any amount of the deposit in excess of the amount required to
reimburse the State shall be returned by the department to the party that made
the deposit. The State shall not be required to pay to the project party any
interest or earnings on the deposit.

(b) The department shall not enter into any
project agreement with respect to any project unless the legislature shall have
first authorized the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds to finance such
project pursuant to section 39A‑117 and the department has determined
that:

(1) The project party is a responsible party, whether
by reason of economic assets or experience in the type of enterprise to be
undertaken through the project, or otherwise; or

(2) The obligations of the project party under the
project agreement will be unconditionally guaranteed by a person who is a
responsible party, whether by reason of economic assets or experience in the
type of enterprise to be undertaken through the project, or otherwise. [L 1981,
c 121, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 44, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next